Utah statutes.
63H-4-105.   Officer or employee -- No forfeiture of office or employment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, an officer or employee of this state does not forfeit an officer's or employee's office or employment by reason of acceptance of membership on the authority or service on it.

